Washington statutes.
RCW 2.56.120

Judicial impact notes—Establishment of procedure—Legislator may request—Copies to be filed.

(1) The administrative office of the courts, in cooperation with appropriate legislative committees and legislative staff, shall establish a procedure for the provision of judicial impact notes on the effect legislative bills will have on the workload and administration of the courts of this state. The administrative office of the courts and the office of financial management shall coordinate the development of judicial impact notes with the preparation of fiscal notes under chapters 43.88A and 43.132 RCW.

(2) The administrative office of the courts shall provide a judicial impact note on any legislative proposal at the request of any legislator. The note shall be provided to the requesting legislator and copies filed with the appropriate legislative committees in accordance with subsection (3) of this section when the proposed legislation is introduced in either house.

(3) When a judicial impact note is prepared and approved by the administrative office of the courts, copies of the note shall be filed with:

(a) The chairperson of the committee to which the bill was referred upon introduction in the house of origin;

(b) The senate committee on ways and means;

(c) The house of representatives committee on ways and means;

(d) The senate judiciary committee;

(e) The house of representatives judiciary committee; and

(f) The office of financial management.

(4) This section shall not prevent either house of the legislature from acting on any bill before it as otherwise provided by the state Constitution, by law, and by the rules and joint rules of the senate and house of representatives, nor shall the lack of any judicial impact note as provided in this section or any error in the accuracy thereof affect the validity of any measure otherwise duly passed by the legislature.

[ 2005 c 282 s 8; 1986 c 158 s 1; 1984 c 258 s 604.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.